Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.20.340

University site dedicated for street and boulevard purposes—Description.

There is hereby dedicated to the public for street and boulevard purposes the following described lands situated in section 16, township 25 north, range 4 east, W.M., and blocks 7 and 8 of Lake Washington shore lands, to wit: Beginning at the one-quarter (1/4) corner on the north line of said section sixteen (16); thence east along the north line thereof, a distance of three hundred forty-nine and thirty-four one-hundredths (349.34) feet; thence south at right angles to the said north line, a distance of thirty-five feet to the point of beginning of this description; thence south eighty-nine degrees fifty-seven minutes and forty-three seconds (89˚57'43") east a distance of six hundred seventy-three and seventeen one-hundredths (673.17) feet; thence southwesterly along the arc of a curve to the left, having a uniform radius of one thousand (1,000) feet, said curve being tangent to the last above described line, a distance of one thousand three hundred seventy-three and six one-hundredths (1,373.06) feet to a point of tangency; thence south eleven degrees twenty-two minutes and two seconds (11˚22'02") west, a distance of five hundred fifty-six and twenty-two one-hundredths (556.22) feet to a point of tangency on the easterly margin of Montlake Boulevard as laid off and established by Ordinance No. 26332; thence along said easterly margin northerly along the arc of a curve to the left, having a uniform radius of four hundred sixty (460) feet, a distance of one hundred forty-three and forty-one one-hundredths (143.41) feet to a point of a reverse curve; thence northerly along the arc of a curve to the right having a uniform radius of four hundred sixty (460) feet, a distance of one hundred twenty and ninety-four one-hundredths (120.94) feet to a point of reverse curve; thence northerly along the arc of a curve to the left, having a uniform radius of two thousand nine hundred seventy-four and ninety-three one-hundredths (2,974.93) feet, a distance of two hundred eighty-four (284) feet; thence departing from said easterly margin north eleven degrees twenty-two minutes and two seconds (11˚22'02") east, a distance of fourteen and seventy-four one-hundredths (14.74) feet to the beginning of a curve to the right, having a uniform radius of one thousand seventy (1,070) feet; thence northeasterly along the arc of said curve, a distance of seven hundred ninety-six and thirty-three one-hundredths (796.33) feet to a point of reverse curve; thence northeasterly, northerly and northwesterly along the arc of a curve to the left, having a uniform radius of seventy-four and forty-six one-hundredths (74.46) feet, a distance of one hundred eighty-seven and ten one-hundredths (187.10) feet to the point of beginning.

Also the following described lands, to wit: Beginning at a point on the east line of said section, said point being distant nine hundred eighty-nine and sixty one-hundredths (989.60) feet south from the northeast corner of said section; thence south along said east line a distance of four hundred seventy-nine and fifty-three one-hundredths (479.53) feet to a point on the government meander line along the shore of Lake Washington; thence along said meander line south seventy-eight degrees thirteen minutes thirty-three seconds (78˚13'33") west, a distance of sixty-six and fifty one-hundredths (66.50) feet; thence north twenty-nine degrees forty-six minutes twenty-seven seconds (29˚46'27") west, a distance of one hundred sixty-six and ninety-two one-hundredths (166.92) feet; thence departing from said meander line north no degrees fifty-three minutes seven seconds (0˚53'07") east, a distance of three hundred fifty-four and sixty-three one-hundredths (354.63) feet; thence northwesterly along the arc of a curve to the right having a uniform radius of one hundred eighty-five (185) feet, a distance of twenty-two and two one-hundredths (22.02) feet to a point of tangency on a line which bears north twenty-nine degrees six minutes fifty-three seconds (29˚06'53") west; thence northwesterly along said line, a distance of nine hundred eighteen and sixty-five one-hundredths (918.65) feet to the beginning of a curve to the left, having a uniform radius of two hundred fifty (250) feet; thence northwesterly along the arc of said curve, a distance of two hundred sixty-five and fifty one-hundredths (265.50) feet to a point of tangency on the south margin of East Forty-fifth Street; thence east along said south margin, a distance of three hundred twenty-nine and fourteen one-hundredths (329.14) feet to a point which is distant five hundred ten and seventy-nine one-hundredths (510.79) feet west from the east line of said section sixteen (16); thence southwesterly, southerly and southeasterly along the arc of a curve to the left having a uniform radius of sixty (60) feet a distance of one hundred twenty-four and seventy-eight one-hundredths (124.78) feet to a point of tangency; thence south twenty-nine degrees six minutes fifty-three seconds (29˚06'53") east, a distance of nine hundred twenty-four and twenty-four one-hundredths (924.24) feet to the beginning of a curve to the left having a uniform radius of one hundred fifteen (115) feet; thence southeasterly along the arc of said curve, a distance of one hundred twenty and fifty-one one-hundredths (120.51) feet to the point of beginning.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28B.20.340. Prior: 1913 c 24 s 1. Formerly RCW 28.77.280.]